Illinois, session 104th, SB1129.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Development Loan Guarantee Act is 5amended by changing Section 30-1 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 516/30-1)7    Sec. 30-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Community Development Loan Guarantee Act. References in 9this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 3-23-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.)